Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 244.040 is amended to read:
244.040. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a public official  may not use or
attempt to use official position or office to obtain financial  gain or avoidance of financial detriment
for the public official, a relative or  member of the household of the public official, or any business
with which the public official or a relative or member of the household of the public  official is as-
sociated, if the financial gain or  avoidance of financial detriment would not otherwise be available
but for the public official’s holding of the official position or office.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) Any part of an official compensation package as determined by the public body  that the
public official serves.
(b) The receipt by a public official  or a relative or member of the household of the public official
of an honorarium or any other item allowed under ORS 244.042.
(c) Reimbursement of expenses.
(d) An unsolicited award for professional achievement.
(e) Gifts that do not  exceed the limits specified in ORS 244.025 received by a public official or
a relative  or member of the household of the public official from a source that could reasonably be
known to have a legislative or administrative interest.
(f) Gifts received by a public official or a relative or member of  the household of the public of-
ficial from a source that could not reasonably be known to have a  legislative or administrative in-
terest.
(g) The receipt by a public official  or a relative or member of the household of the public official
of any item, regardless of value, that is expressly excluded from the definition of “gift” in ORS
244.020.
(h) Contributions made to a legal expense trust  fund established under ORS 244.209 for the
benefit of the public official.
(3) A public official may not solicit or receive, either  directly or indirectly, and a person may
not offer or give to any public official any pledge or promise of future employment,  based on any
understanding that the vote, official action or judgment of the  public official would be influenced
by the pledge or promise.
Enrolled Senate Bill 62 (SB 62-INTRO) Page 1
(4) A public official may not attempt to further or further the  personal gain of the public official
through the use of confidential information gained in the course of or by  reason of holding position
as a public official or activities of the public official.
(5) A [ person who has ceased to be a ] former  public official may not attempt  to further or fur-
ther the personal gain of any person through the use of confidential information gained in the
course of or by reason of holding position as a public official or the activities of the person  as a
public official.
(6) A person may not attempt  to represent or represent a client for a fee before the governing
body of a public body of which the person is  a member. This subsection does not apply to the
person’s employer, business partner or other associate.
(7) A  current or former public official may not solicit, receive or use public moneys from
a public body, as defined in ORS 174.109, to pay or make payments on a civil penalty imposed
on the current or former public official by the Oregon Government Ethics  Commission in
accordance with ORS 171.992 or 244.350.
[(7)] (8)  The  provisions of this section apply regardless of whether actual conflicts of interest
or potential conflicts of interest are announced or disclosed under ORS 244.120.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to  ORS 244.040 by section 1 of this 2021 Act apply to the
payment of civil penalties imposed by the Oregon Government Ethics Commission on or after
the effective date of this 2021 Act.
Passed by Senate April 12, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 1, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 62 (SB 62-INTRO) Page 2